Washington statutes.
RCW 9.04.070

False, misleading, deceptive advertising—Penalty.

Any person who violates any order or injunction issued pursuant to RCW 9.04.050 through 9.04.080 shall be subject to a fine of not more than five thousand dollars or imprisonment for not more than ninety days or both.

[ 1999 c 143 s 1; 1961 c 189 s 3.]